Utah statutes.
34-38-11.   Bases for cause of action for defamation, libel, slander, or
damage to reputation.
No cause of action for defamation of character, libel, slander, or damage to
reputation arises in favor of any person against an employer who has
established a program of drug or alcohol testing in accordance with this
chapter, unless:
(1)  the results of that test were disclosed to any person other than the
employer, an authorized employee or agent of the employer, the tested
employee, or the tested prospective employee;
(2)  the information disclosed was based on a false test result;
(3)  the false test result was disclosed with malice; and
(4)  all elements of an action for defamation of character, libel, slander, or
damage to reputation as established by statute or common law, are satisfied.
